District of Columbia statutes.
29-704.01

Becoming general partner.

(a)

A person becomes a general partner:

(1)

Upon formation of a limited partnership, as agreed among the persons that are to be the initial partners; and

(2)

After formation:

(A)

As provided in the partnership agreement;

(B)

Under § 29-708.01(3)(B) following the dissociation of a limited partnership’s last general partner;

(C)

As the result of a merger under subchapter X of this chapter or a transaction under Chapter 2 of this title; or

(D)

With the consent of all the partners.

(3)

As the result of a merger under subchapter X of this chapter or a transaction under Chapter 2 of this title; or

(4)

With the consent of all the partners.

(b)

A person may become a general partner without:

(1)

Acquiring a transferable interest; or

(2)

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the partnership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the (a) designation; rewrote (a)(1) and (a)(2); and added (b).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 401 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.